Louisiana, session 2026, HB266.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:563(13) through (17) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
37:563(18) through (21) and 584.1 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§563. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following words have the following meanings:
* * *
(13) "Mechanical devices" means clips, combs, crochet hooks, curlers,
curling irons, hairpins, rollers, scissors, blunt-tipped needles, thread, and hair
binders.
(14) "Mobile salon" means a self-contained facility, where cosmetology is
practiced for a fee, that may be moved, towed, or transported from one location to
another.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-54 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 266
(15) "Natural hair braider" means any person who engages in natural hair
braiding.
(16) "Natural hair braiding" means the twisting, wrapping, weaving,
extending, locking, or braiding of hair by hand or with mechanical devices. Natural
hair braiding includes all of the following:
(a) The use of natural or synthetic hair extensions, natural or synthetic hair
and fibers, decorative beads, and other hair accessories.
(b) Minor trimming of natural hair or hair extensions incidental to twisting,
wrapping, weaving, extending, locking, or braiding hair.
(c) The use of topical agents such as conditioners, gels, moisturizers, oils,
pomades, and shampoos in conjunction with performing any action as described in
this Paragraph.
(17) "Natural hair braiding service" means any service performed by a
natural hair braider engaged in the practice of natural hair braiding as defined in this
Section.
(14)(18) "Satellite classroom" means a separate classroom location used as
supplemental training space located under the same roof of the main school building
or on the same campus as the administrative center and within at least three hundred
feet of the main school building for the purpose of training an overflow of students
who cannot be accommodated at the main school.
(15)(19) "School" means any premises wherein cosmetology is taught.
(16)(20) "Student" means a person registered in a school authorized by the
board to teach cosmetology.
(17)(21) "Teacher" or "instructor" means a person who teaches cosmetology
for direct or indirect compensation, within a school.
* * *
§584.1. Special permit requirements for natural hair braiding services
A. A special permit is required for natural hair braiding services at any
location. Natural hair braiding services shall not include any of the following:
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-54 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 266
(1) The application of dyes, reactive chemicals, or other preparations to alter
the color of the hair or to straighten, curl, or alter the structure of the hair.
(2) The use of chemical hair joining agents such as synthetic tape, keratin
bonds, or fusion bonds.
B. Natural hair braiding is defined in R.S. 37:563 and may be used to
reference African hair braiding or styling, but is not limited to any particular cultural,
ethnic, racial, or religious forms of hair styles.
C.(1) A person shall annually meet all of the following requirements to
receive a special permit as a registered natural hair braider:
(a) Review training materials on sanitation and safety prepared by the office
of public health in the Louisiana Department of Health.
(b) Pass a twenty-question examination on sanitation and safety prepared by
and administered by the office of public health in the Louisiana Department of
Health.
(c) Complete the board's application for a natural hair braiding permit and
submit the application and completed examination to the board by mail, in person,
or on the board's website.
(d) Pay applicable fees for a special permit as outlined in R.S. 37:599.
(2) The board shall issue a special permit upon verifying a person has passed
the examination by at least seventy percent.
(3) A person who holds a valid special permit issued pursuant to this
Subsection shall be exempt from a certification of registration for beauty shops or
salons.
(4) The board shall make the training materials, examination, and application
available at its office and on its website.
D. Ordinances by units of local government that prohibit natural hair
braiding, natural hair braiding services, or natural hair braiders, or regulate any
matter relating to the licensing, testing, training, facilities, or equipment of natural
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-54 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 266
hair braiding, natural hair braiding services, or natural hair braiders are preempted
by the provisions of this Chapter.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2027.